Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201181-1120.02
Terms, defined.

As
used in sections 81-1120.01 to 81-1120.29, unless the context
otherwise requires:

(1) Director means the Director of Communications;

(2) Division means the division of communications of the office of Chief
Information Officer;

(3) Communications system means the total communications facilities
and equipment owned, leased, or used by all departments, agencies, and subdivisions
of state government; and

(4) Communications means any transmission, emission, or reception of
signs, signals, writing, images, and sounds or intelligence of any nature
by wire, radio, optical, or other electromagnetic systems.

Laws 1967, c. 572, § 2, p. 1880;

Laws 1971, LB 675, § 3;

Laws 1975, LB 427, § 4;

Laws 1984, LB 1125, § 5;

Laws 1986, LB 965, § 22;

Laws 2000, LB 893, § 2;

Laws 2006, LB 921, § 6;

Laws 2011, LB378, § 26.
May 18, 2011